District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.16

Highway construction program authorized.

A program of construction projects to meet immediate capital needs for highways in the District is hereby authorized.

History

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 110, ch. 218, title IV, § 401

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-132.
1973 Ed., § 7-132.